Colorado, session 2026A, SB096.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Over 330,000 veterans live in Colorado, many of whom have
experienced combat and returned home with "invisible injuries" such as
PTSD, traumatic brain injury, substance use disorder, military sexual
trauma, and other trauma-related conditions;
(b) Research has found a significant correlation between military-
service-related invisible injuries and aggressive, self-destructive behavior,
increased suicide risk, and involvement with the criminal justice system,
leading to disproportionate incarceration levels of veterans;
(c) A study found that 87% of incarcerated veterans have
experienced trauma and 39% screened positive for PTSD, compared to
6% of the civilian population;
(d) Colorado has established a veterans court program to help
justice-involved veterans and active-duty military members address
-2- SB26-096

service-related trauma through rehabilitation, treatment, and peer support;
(e) Only 5 of Colorado's 23 judicial districts have veterans court
programs, meaning only 10% to 15% of Colorado justice-involved
veterans have access to a veterans court program, leaving many
justice-involved veterans, especially those in rural areas, without support;
(f) Establishing veteran-deferred sentencing and sentence
mitigation options in courts statewide will close the justice-involved
veterans support gap by helping eligible veterans with military-
service-related injuries across the state receive treatment, thereby
reducing recidivism, enhancing public safety, and helping veterans be
successful in their communities, all while saving taxpayer money on jail
and prison beds; and
(g) Establishing a standardized process to identify veterans at
department of corrections diagnostic centers is a critical gateway to
rehabilitation, continuity of care, and public safety, and a failure to
identify veterans early results in higher correctional costs, increased
medical and mental health expenditures, and missed opportunities for
diversion, programming, treatment, and reentry planning.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 18-1.3-103.8 as
follows:
18-1.3-103.8. Justice-involved veterans - eligibility assessment
- deferred sentencing - discharge and dismissal - data collection and
evaluation - sentence mitigation - training - legislative declaration -
definitions.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "APPLICABLE CONDITION" MEANS SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER,
-3- SB26-096

MILITARY SEXUAL TRAUMA, TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY, POST-TRAUMATIC
STRESS DISORDER, OR OTHER MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION THAT IS
RELATED TO AN INDIVIDUAL'S MILITARY SERVICE IN SOME MANNER,
INCLUDING PSYCHOLOGICAL EFFECTS FROM A VETERAN'S TIME IN SERVICE
OR A PERIOD OF FAMILY SEPARATION RELATED TO DEPLOYMENT.
(b) "ELIGIBLE OFFENSE" MEANS A FELONY OR MISDEMEANOR
EXCEPT FOR A FELONY OR MISDEMEANOR THAT IS A CRIME OF VIOLENCE AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406.
(c) "VETERAN" MEANS A PERSON WHO ACTIVELY SERVED OR IS
SERVING IN THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES. "VETERAN" INCLUDES A
PERSON WHO SERVED OR IS SERVING IN THE NATIONAL GUARD OR AS A
RESERVIST.
(2) Eligibility assessment.
(a) BEFORE BEING SENTENCED, A VETERAN WHO IS CONVICTED OF
AN ELIGIBLE OFFENSE MAY REQUEST THAT THE COURT CONDUCT AN
ELIGIBILITY ASSESSMENT TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE DEFENDANT IS
ELIGIBLE FOR A DEFERRED SENTENCE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(b) A DEFENDANT WHO IS A HABITUAL OFFENDER AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 18-1.3-801 IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR A DEFERRED SENTENCE.
(c) UPON MAKING AN ELIGIBILITY ASSESSMENT REQUEST, THE
DEFENDANT MUST RELEASE OR AUTHORIZE ACCESS TO MILITARY SERVICE
REPORTS AND RECORDS RELATING TO AN ALLEGED APPLICABLE CONDITION
STEMMING FROM SERVICE IN THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES. THE
COURT SHALL FILE THESE RECORDS AS CONFIDENTIAL, AND THE RECORDS
MUST REMAIN SEALED PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-72-705 (1)(a). THE
DEFENDANT, THROUGH EXISTING RECORDS OR A LICENSED PROFESSIONAL
EVALUATION, HAS THE BURDEN TO ESTABLISH THE DIAGNOSIS OF THE
-4- SB26-096

APPLICABLE CONDITION AND THE CONDITION'S CONNECTION TO MILITARY
SERVICE. THE COURT, ON ITS OWN MOTION OR THE PROSECUTOR'S MOTION
WITH NOTICE TO DEFENSE COUNSEL, MAY ORDER THE DEFENDANT TO
FURNISH TO THE COURT FOR IN CAMERA REVIEW AND TO THE PROSECUTOR
COPIES OF ALL MEDICAL AND MILITARY SERVICE REPORTS AND RECORDS
PREVIOUSLY OR SUBSEQUENTLY MADE CONCERNING THE DEFENDANT'S
CONDITION AND THE CONDITION'S CONNECTION TO MILITARY SERVICE.
(d) A DEFENDANT IS ELIGIBLE FOR DEFERRED SENTENCING
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IF THE VETERAN DEFENDANT'S CHARGED
OFFENSE IS AN ELIGIBLE OFFENSE, THE VETERAN DEFENDANT HAS FILED
THE REQUIRED DOCUMENTS, THE DEFENDANT IS NOT A HABITUAL
OFFENDER AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-1.3-801, AND THE COURT
DETERMINES BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT:
(I) THE DEFENDANT SUFFERS FROM AN APPLICABLE CONDITION;
(II) THE CONDITION STEMS FROM THE DEFENDANT'S SERVICE IN
THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES; AND
(III) THE OFFENSE WAS COMMITTED AS A RESULT OF THE
APPLICABLE CONDITION.
(e) WITHIN FOURTEEN DAYS AFTER A COURT'S ELIGIBILITY
ASSESSMENT FINDING, EITHER PARTY MAY FILE A CHALLENGE AND
REQUEST A HEARING ON THE DEFENDANT'S ELIGIBILITY FOR DEFERRED
SENTENCING.
(3) Deferred sentencing.
(a) WHEN A COURT FINDS A DEFENDANT ELIGIBLE FOR DEFERRED
SENTENCING AND THE DEFENDANT IS FOUND GUILTY AT TRIAL OR UPON A
PLEA OF GUILTY, THE COURT SHALL:
(I) DEFER FURTHER PROCEEDINGS AND PLACE A DEFENDANT WHO
-5- SB26-096

IS ELIGIBLE FOR DEFERRED SENTENCING ON PROBATION ON REASONABLE
CONDITIONS AND FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED THE MAXIMUM PERIOD
PROVIDED BY LAW;
(II) IMPOSE CONDITIONS THAT INCLUDE TREATMENT, SERVICES,
REHABILITATION, OR EDUCATION SUFFICIENT SO THAT, IF COMPLETED, THE
DEFENDANT WOULD BE ELIGIBLE FOR DISCHARGE FROM PROBATION AND
DISMISSAL OF CHARGES PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION;
(III) ORDER A MENTAL HEALTH ASSESSMENT CONDUCTED BY A
LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL; AND
(IV) ORDER COMPLETION OF A CASE PLAN CREATED BY THE
PRESIDING JUDGE IN COLLABORATION WITH A VETERANS JUSTICE
OUTREACH SPECIALIST FROM THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AFFAIRS AND THE PROBATION OFFICER ASSIGNED TO THE CASE
THAT INCORPORATES THE RECOMMENDATIONS CONTAINED IN THE
LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL'S ASSESSMENT.
(b) THE COURT MAY ORDER A DEFENDANT TO ATTEND A
TREATMENT PROGRAM AS A CONDITION OF PROBATION FOR A PERIOD UP TO
THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE PERIOD PROVIDED BY LAW.
(c) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT A DEFENDANT IS ELIGIBLE FOR
A DEFERRED SENTENCE BUT THE DEFENDANT HAS PREVIOUSLY RECEIVED
A DEFERRED SENTENCE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION FOR A FELONY
OFFENSE, THE COURT MAY IMPOSE A DEFERRED SENTENCE OR SENTENCE
THE DEFENDANT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN LAW.
(d) IF A DEFENDANT VIOLATES A CONDITION OF THEIR PROBATION,
THE COURT MAY ENTER AN ADJUDICATION OF GUILT AND PROCEED AS
OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN LAW.
(e) IF AVAILABLE, THE DEFENDANT'S PROBATION MAY BE
-6- SB26-096

SUPERVISED BY A VETERANS COURT PROGRAM PURSUANT TO SECTION
18-1.3-202.5. A VETERANS COURT PROGRAM SHALL TIMELY
COMMUNICATE A DEFENDANT'S SUCCESSFUL OR UNSUCCESSFUL
COMPLETION OF THE PROGRAM TO THE COURT OF ORIGINAL JURISDICTION
FOR FURTHER ACTION.
(4) Discharge and dismissal.
(a) UPON THE EXPIRATION OF THE PERIOD OF A DEFENDANT'S
PROBATION, THE COURT SHALL HOLD A HEARING TO DISCHARGE THE
DEFENDANT FROM PROBATION AND DETERMINE WHETHER TO DISMISS THE
PROCEEDINGS AGAINST A DEFENDANT WHO RECEIVED A DEFERRED
SENTENCE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE HEARING MUST BE
SCHEDULED SO THAT THE PARTIES HAVE ADEQUATE TIME TO PREPARE AND
PRESENT ARGUMENTS REGARDING THE ISSUE OF DISMISSAL. THE PARTIES
MAY SUBMIT WRITTEN ARGUMENTS TO THE COURT PRIOR TO THE DATE OF
THE HEARING AND MAKE ORAL ARGUMENTS BEFORE THE COURT AT THE
HEARING.
(b) THE PROSECUTION SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO ANY
IDENTIFIABLE VICTIM OF THE OFFENSE AT LEAST FOURTEEN DAYS BEFORE
THE HEARING IS HELD. THE VICTIM MAY SUBMIT AN ORAL OR WRITTEN
STATEMENT TO THE COURT AT THE TIME OF THE HEARING DESCRIBING THE
HARM THEY SUFFERED AS A RESULT OF THE CRIME AND THE VICTIM'S
RECOMMENDATION ON WHETHER THE DISMISSAL SHOULD BE GRANTED OR
DENIED. THE JUDGE SHALL CONSIDER THE VICTIM'S STATEMENT WHEN
MAKING THE DECISION. IF THE VICTIM NOTIFIES THE PROSECUTOR OF AN
OBJECTION TO DISMISSAL AND IS NOT PRESENT AT THE HEARING, THE
PROSECUTOR SHALL MAKE THE VICTIM'S OBJECTION KNOWN TO THE
COURT.
-7- SB26-096

(c) AFTER THE HEARING DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COURT SHALL DISMISS THE PROCEEDINGS AGAINST THE
DEFENDANT IF THE COURT FINDS BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE
THAT THE DEFENDANT:
(I) SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED PROBATION;
(II) SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED COURT-ORDERED TREATMENT,
SERVICES, OR EDUCATION TO ADDRESS THE APPLICABLE CONDITION
CAUSED BY MILITARY SERVICE;
(III) DOES NOT REPRESENT A DANGER TO THE HEALTH OR SAFETY
OF A VICTIM OR OTHERS; AND
(IV) HAS DEMONSTRATED SIGNIFICANT BENEFIT FROM
COURT-ORDERED EDUCATION, TREATMENT, OR REHABILITATION TO
CLEARLY SHOW THAT A DISCHARGE AND DISMISSAL IS IN THE INTERESTS
OF JUSTICE.
(d) IN DETERMINING THE INTERESTS OF JUSTICE, THE COURT MAY
CONSIDER, AMONG OTHER FACTORS, THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE DEFENDANT'S COMPLETION AND DEGREE OF PARTICIPATION
IN EDUCATION, TREATMENT, OR REHABILITATION AS ORDERED BY THE
COURT;
(II) THE DEFENDANT'S PROGRESS IN FORMAL EDUCATION;
(III) THE DEFENDANT'S DEVELOPMENT OF CAREER POTENTIAL;
(IV) THE DEFENDANT'S LEADERSHIP AND PERSONAL
RESPONSIBILITY EFFORTS;
(V) COMMUNITY SERVICE COMPLETED BY THE DEFENDANT;
(VI) THE LEVEL OF HARM TO THE COMMUNITY FROM THE OFFENSE;
(VII) THE LEVEL OF HARM TO THE VICTIM FROM THE OFFENSE; OR
(VIII) THE STATEMENT OF THE VICTIM, IF ANY.
-8- SB26-096

(e) IF THE COURT FINDS THAT THE DEFENDANT DOES NOT QUALIFY
FOR DISCHARGE AND DISMISSAL PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE COURT
SHALL ENTER AN ADJUDICATION OF GUILT AND PROCEED AS OTHERWISE
PROVIDED IN LAW.
(f) IF THE COURT FINDS THE DEFENDANT QUALIFIES FOR DISMISSAL,
THE COURT SHALL DISMISS THE CHARGES AGAINST THE DEFENDANT.
(5) Data collection and evaluation.
(a) EACH JUDICIAL DISTRICT SHALL TRACK AND REPORT ANNUALLY
TO THE DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE IN THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
SAFETY THE NUMBER OF VETERAN DEFENDANTS RECEIVING,
SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETING, DECLINING, AND DENIED A VETERAN
DEFERRED SENTENCE. ALL DATA COLLECTED AND REPORTED MUST BE
CATEGORIZED BY RACE, ETHNICITY, GENDER, AGE, MILITARY DISCHARGE
CHARACTERIZATION, AND OFFENSE TYPE.
(b) THE DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE IN THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A PLAN FOR TRACKING
OUTCOMES AMONG VETERANS WHO RECEIVE A VETERAN-DEFERRED
SENTENCE, INCLUDING RECIDIVISM, HOUSING STATUS, AND EMPLOYMENT
STATUS.
(c) THE DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE IN THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY SHALL DEVELOP A PLAN FOR OUTGOING EVALUATIONS BY
VETERAN DEFENDANTS WHO RECEIVED A VETERAN-DEFERRED SENTENCE.
(6) Sentencing mitigation.
(a) AT ARRAIGNMENT, THE COURT SHALL NOTIFY A DEFENDANT
THAT VETERAN STATUS MAY HAVE MITIGATION VALUE IN SENTENCING.
(b) BEFORE SENTENCING, THE COURT SHALL OFFER A DEFENDANT
THE ABILITY TO COMMUNICATE THEIR VETERAN STATUS THROUGH
-9- SB26-096

COUNSEL OR BY OTHER MEANS, AVOIDING THE NEED FOR
SELF-IDENTIFICATION OF VETERAN STATUS IN OPEN COURT. IF A
DEFENDANT COMMUNICATES THEIR VETERAN STATUS TO THE COURT PRIOR
TO SENTENCING AND THE DEFENDANT'S CONVICTION IS A MISDEMEANOR
OR FELONY OTHER THAN A CLASS 1 FELONY OR AN OFFENSE THAT
REQUIRES SEX OFFENDER REGISTRATION PURSUANT TO SECTION
16-22-103, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER THE DEFENDANT'S VETERAN
STATUS AS A MITIGATING FACTOR WHEN DETERMINING THE DEFENDANT'S
SENTENCE.
(c) BEFORE SENTENCING, A VETERAN DEFENDANT MAY PRESENT
PROOF TO THE COURT THAT THE DEFENDANT HAS, SINCE THE COMMISSION
OF THE OFFENSE, ENGAGED IN SUBSTANTIAL REHABILITATIVE EFFORTS.
(d) IF PROVIDED, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER INDIVIDUAL MERIT
EARNED DURING SERVICE, OVERSEAS DEPLOYMENT, EXPOSURE TO
DANGER, AND SERVICE-CONNECTED DISABILITY RATINGS WHEN
DETERMINING A VETERAN DEFENDANT'S SENTENCE. WHEN CONSIDERING
MULTIPLE FACTORS, THE COURT SHALL GIVE ADDITIONAL CREDIT FOR
EACH FACTOR. VETERAN STATUS SHALL NOT BE USED AS AN AGGREGATING
FACTOR IN SENTENCING DECISIONS BY THE COURT. THE COURT SHALL
CONSIDER VETERAN STATUS IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER EXISTING
MITIGATION FACTOR PROVIDED FOR MENTAL HEALTH CONDITIONS. THE
COURT SHALL NOT TREAT OTHER TRAUMA SUFFERED BY A VETERAN AS A
DENIAL OF THE EXISTENCE OF MILITARY TRAUMA.
(7) Training. LAW ENFORCEMENT, COURTS, AND CORRECTIONS
PERSONNEL SHALL TRAIN ALL THEIR EMPLOYEES ON VETERAN
INVOLVEMENT WITH THE CRIMINAL-JUSTICE SYSTEM AND VETERAN
EXPOSURE TO VIOLENCE AND TRAUMA. TRAINING MUST INCLUDE TRAINING
-10- SB26-096

ON MILITARY SEXUAL TRAUMA.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 17-40-101, add (5)
as follows:
17-40-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 40, unless the context otherwise requires:
(5) "VETERAN" MEANS A PERSON WHO ACTIVELY SERVED IN THE
UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES AND WHO WAS DISCHARGED OR RELEASED
UNDER CONDITIONS OTHER THAN DISHONORABLE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
U.S.C. TITLE 38, AS AMENDED. "VETERAN" INCLUDES A PERSON SERVING
OR WHO SERVED IN THE NATIONAL GUARD OR AS A RESERVIST.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 17-40-103, amend
(1) introductory portion as follows:
17-40-103. Examination of offenders - report.
(1) As soon as possible after July 1, 1974, Each offender entering
the diagnostic center shall MUST receive appropriate diagnostic services,
and each offender's treatment and employment needs shall be identified.
Information provided pursuant to section SECTIONS 17-40-103.5 AND
17-40-104 shall be considered in structuring the rehabilitation program.
An offender shall be assigned to the assessment program for a period not
to exceed sixty days; except that an offender may be held for an
additional thirty days upon approval of the executive director. Upon
completion of the recommended rehabilitation report, it shall be
transmitted by the superintendent THE SUPERINTENDENT SHALL TRANSMIT
THE REPORT to the executive director, who, within fifteen days, shall
cause the offender to be:
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 17-40-103.5 as
follows:
-11- SB26-096

17-40-103.5. Veteran identification process - veteran
placement, programming, and services - report.
(1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CREATE A STANDARDIZED PROCESS
TO IDENTIFY WHICH OFFENDERS ARE VETERANS. THE STANDARDIZED
VETERAN IDENTIFICATION PROCESS MAY INCLUDE:
(a) DIRECT INTAKE QUESTIONING;
(b) DATA VERIFICATION WITH THE COLORADO DEPARTMENT OF
MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS AND VETERANS JUSTICE OUTREACH IN
THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS; OR
(c) OFFENDER MILITARY DOCUMENT REVIEW.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL IMPLEMENT IN EACH DIAGNOSTIC
CENTER OPERATED BY THE DEPARTMENT THE STANDARDIZED VETERAN
IDENTIFICATION PROCESS THAT ALL OFFENDERS MUST PARTAKE IN WHILE
RECEIVING DIAGNOSTIC SERVICES.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGNATE VETERAN OFFENDERS AS
VETERANS IN THEIR RECOMMENDED REHABILITATION REPORT.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE VETERAN-SPECIFIC SERVICES
IN VETERAN-OFFENDER-RECOMMENDED REHABILITATION REPORTS THAT
MAY INCLUDE VETERANS JUSTICE OUTREACH, TREATMENT AT A UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS FACILITY, MENTAL HEALTH
SERVICES, SUBSTANCE USE TREATMENT, AND REENTRY PLANNING.
(5) WHEN APPROPRIATE, VETERAN OFFENDERS MUST BE
CONSIDERED FOR CORRECTIONAL FACILITY PLACEMENT IN DESIGNATED
VETERAN HOUSING UNITS OR VETERAN-FOCUSED PROGRAMMING.
(6) BEGINNING IN JANUARY 2028, AND IN JANUARY EVERY YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE, AS PART OF ITS
PRESENTATION DURING ITS "SMART ACT" HEARING REQUIRED BY
-12- SB26-096

SECTION 2-7-203, INFORMATION CONCERNING THE NUMBER OF IDENTIFIED
INCARCERATED VETERANS, PARTICIPATION RATES IN CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY VETERAN HOUSING UNITS AND VETERAN SERVICES, AND
RECIDIVISM RATES FOR VETERAN OFFENDERS.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-705, amend
(1)(a)(III) and (1)(a)(IV); and add (1)(a)(V) as follows:
24-72-705. Sealing criminal justice records other than
convictions - simplified process - applicability.
(1) (a) On its own motion, the court shall order the defendant's
criminal justice records sealed when:
(III) The defendant completes a diversion agreement pursuant to
section 18-1.3-101 when a criminal case has been filed; or
(IV) The defendant completes a deferred judgment and sentence
pursuant to section 18-1.3-102 and all counts are dismissed; OR
(V) THE DEFENDANT COMPLETES A DEFERRED SENTENCE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-1.3-103.8 AND ALL COUNTS ARE DISMISSED.
SECTION 7. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-13- SB26-096

(2) This act applies to cases in which charges are filed on or after
the applicable effective date of this act.
-14- SB26-096